New York, session 2025-2026, A8234.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Sections 1, 2, 3 and 7 of chapter 220 of the laws of 1976 2 incorporating the Brockport Exempt Firemen's Benevolent Association, 3 Monroe county, New York, and providing for its powers and duties, are 4 amended to read as follows: 5 Section 1. Incorporation; membership. A membership corporation by the 6 name of "Brockport Exempt Volunteer [Firemen's] Firefighters' Benevolent 7 Association, Inc." is hereby created. It shall be composed of such 8 persons eligible to membership therein as hereinafter provided as shall 9 (a) notify the secretary of the Brockport Fire [Department] District, a 10 volunteer fire [department] district, in writing prior to the organiza- 11 tion meeting hereinafter provided for of the corporation created by this 12 act of their desire to become members, or (b) shall attend such meeting 13 or an adjournment thereof, and also such persons so eligible as may 14 thereafter become members of such corporation pursuant to its by-laws. 15 § 2. Persons eligible to membership. All persons who are now, or have 16 been, or hereafter shall be active volunteer members of the fire depart- 17 ment of the village of Brockport, in the town of Sweden, county of 18 Monroe, or of any fire company in [such village] the Brockport Fire 19 District and who have acquired or shall hereafter acquire the status of 20 exempt volunteer [firemen] firefighter as defined in section [two 21 hundred] 200 of the general municipal law by virtue of having rendered 22 service in such fire department, fire district or fire company, and all EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11767-06-5 A. 8234--A 2 1 persons who are now or hereafter shall be active volunteer members of 2 such fire [department] district, shall be eligible for membership in the 3 corporation created by this act, except that any [fireman] firefighter 4 who has been removed for cause, expelled or dropped from the rolls of 5 any fire company or fire department, and who has not been reinstated 6 therein, shall not be eligible for membership in such corporation. The 7 membership of any person in such corporation shall terminate when [his] 8 their membership as an active volunteer member of the fire [department 9 of the village] district of Brockport shall terminate before such person 10 shall have acquired the status of exempt [fireman] firefighter as 11 defined in section [two hundred] 200 of the general municipal law by 12 virtue of having rendered service in such fire [department] district. 13 § 3. Purposes. The purposes of such corporation shall be the mainte- 14 nance of suitable headquarters for, and the promotion of fraternal 15 intercourse among the members of such corporation, the relief, aid and 16 assistance of such members and their families who are injured, disabled 17 or indigent, and the promotion of the welfare of the volunteer fire 18 service within the [village of Brockport and] territory provided with 19 fire protection by [contract with such village] the Brockport Fire 20 District, to promote and safeguard the welfare of the volunteer members 21 of the corporation and their families; to provide for the health and 22 safety of the volunteer members of such corporation; and to enhance the 23 morale of volunteer members of the corporation by providing social and 24 recreational activities for the volunteer members of the corporation. 25 § 7. Precept for payment of foreign fire insurance premium taxes. Such 26 corporation shall collect and there shall be paid to it all taxes 27 imposed by section [five hundred fifty-three] 9104 of the insurance law 28 for fire department use and benefit, upon premiums for insurance against 29 loss or damage by fire covering property situated in the village of 30 Brockport, [in the] town of Sweden, county of Monroe, or within any duly 31 organized territory in which the Brockport Fire [Department] District is 32 or may be obligated to render fire protection. The officer of said 33 corporation designated by its by-laws to collect and receive the afore- 34 said tax shall have all the powers and be subject to all the provisions 35 of the insurance law, relating to treasurers of fire departments. Such 36 corporation shall also be entitled to receive a share of the tax imposed 37 by section [five hundred fifty-four] 9105 of the insurance law, based 38 upon the business written in the territory with respect to which it is 39 entitled to collect and receive the tax under section [five hundred 40 fifty-three] 9104 of the insurance law. Such taxes shall only be used 41 [for the care and relief of disabled or indigent volunteer and exempt 42 volunteer firemen and their families] by the corporation in furtherance 43 of its purposes as set forth in section three of this act. 44 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 45 the amendments to section 7 of chapter 220 of the laws of 1976 made by 46 section one of this act shall apply to taxes due on premiums received on 47 and after January 1, 2026.